California, session 20252026, AB2425.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Division 27 (commencing with Section 110005) is added to the Financial Code, to read:DIVISION 27. Budget Reports110005. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on or before March 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the commissioner shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Banking and Financial Institutions Committee, and the Assembly Banking and Finance Committee the projected and actual revenues and expenditures, including the difference between revenues and expenditures, for the immediately preceding fiscal year for all of the following laws administered by the department: (1) Part 3 (commencing with Section 25200) of Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.(2) Division 5 (commencing with 31000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.(3) Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000).(4) Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000).(5) Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000). (6) Division 10 (commencing with Section 23000).(7) Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000).(8) Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000).(9) Division 24 (commencing with Section 90000).(10) Division 25 (commencing with Section 100000).(11) Division 1.25 (commencing with Section 3101).(b) The first report required under paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) shall be submitted on or before February 1, 2027, and subsequent annual reports shall be provided by March 1 of each year.(c) The projected and actual revenues reported pursuant to this section shall be categorized and reported as exam or nonexam revenues. Any nonexam revenues shall be reported in subcategories containing totals for annual assessment revenue, application and licensing fees, renewal fees, fingerprinting fees, penalties and settlement revenue, income from the Surplus Money Investment Fund (SMIF), investigation fees, delinquent fees, and cost recovery.(d) For each division listed in subdivision (a) that authorizes the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation to issue and collect assessments and charges on a pro rata basis to recover the actual costs of administering that division, the department shall include in any report pursuant to this section the method of determining those assessments and charges.SECTION 1.Section 17208 of the Financial Code is amended to read:17208.(a)All money received by the commissioner shall be paid by the commissioner into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Corporations Fund for the sole purpose of administering and enforcing this division.(b)The commissioner shall annually submit a report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code that provides a detailed budget and accounting of the commissioner’s oversight, implementation, and enforcement of this division.